Utah statutes.
63M-1-1505.   Criteria for participation -- Report.

(1)  The advisory board shall develop objective criteria including the following:

(a)  a three year commitment by the applicant to provide a project manager with a travel and operating budget;

(b)  evidence that both the business community and the local government support the Utah Pioneer Communities Program approach philosophically and financially;

(c)  capacity for economic change as a result of being a participant in the program;

(d)  geographic location, population, and economic base diversity;

(e)  evidence of past preservation efforts; and

(f)  a population of less than 50,000.

(2)  The advisory board shall provide to the governor and to the presiding officer of each house of the Legislature an annual report on the effects of the Utah Pioneer Communities Program.

